Utah statutes.
48-2a-202 (Repealed 07/01/13).   Amendment to certificate.

(1) (a)  A certificate of limited partnership is amended by filing a certificate of amendment with the division.

(b)  A certificate of amendment filed under this Subsection (1) shall state:

(i)  the name of the limited partnership;

(ii)  the date of filing the certificate; and

(iii)  the amendment to the certificate.

(2) An amendment to a certificate of limited partnership shall be filed within 60 days after the day the limited partnership continues business under Section 48-2a-801 after an event of withdrawal of a general partner.

(3)  A general partner who knows or reasonably should know that any statement in a certificate of limited partnership or a certificate of amendment to a certificate of limited partnership was false at the time the certificate was executed making the certificate inaccurate in any respect, shall promptly amend the certificate.

(4)  A certificate of limited partnership may be amended at any time for any other proper purpose the general partners determine.

(5) A person may not be held liable because an amendment to a certificate of limited partnership has not been filed under Subsection (2) if the amendment is filed within the 60 days specified in Subsection (2).

(6)  A restated certificate of limited partnership may be executed and filed in the same manner as a certificate of amendment.

